test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_tahhee_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - tahhee: # taken from affixes
    tahhee+N+Sg+Nom: tahhee
    tahhee+N+Sg+Gen: tahhee
    tahhee+N+Sg+Acc: tahhee
    tahhee+N+Sg+Ill: tahhei 
    tahhee+N+Sg+Loc: tahhest 
    tahhee+N+Sg+Com: tahhein
    tahhee+N+Sg+Abe: tahheettáá
    tahhee+N+Ess: tahhen
    tahhee+N+Par: tahhed
    tahhee+N+Pl+Nom: tahheeh
    tahhee+N+Pl+Gen: tahhei
    tahhee+N+Pl+Acc: tahheid
    tahhee+N+Pl+Ill: tahheid
    tahhee+N+Pl+Loc: tahhein
    tahhee+N+Pl+Com: tahheiguin
    tahhee+N+Pl+Abe: tahheittáá
